Illinois, session 104th, HB4866.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 8g-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/8g-1)7    Sec. 8g-1. Fund transfers. 8June 7, 2023 ( Public Act 103-8) June 7, 2023 ( Public Act 9103-8) July 1, 2024 ( Public Act 103-588)10    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 11for by law, on July 1, 2024, or as soon thereafter as 12practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 13Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $500,000 from the General 14Revenue Fund to the Governor's Administrative Fund.15    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 16for by law, on July 1, 2024, or as soon thereafter as 17practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 18Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $500,000 from the General 19Revenue Fund to the Grant Accountability and Transparency 20Fund. 21    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 22for by law, on July 1, 2024, or as soon thereafter as 23practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State   HB4866- 2 -LRB104 15769 HLH 28958 b1Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $25,000,000 from the 2Violent Crime Witness Protection Program Fund to the General 3Revenue Fund. 4    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 5for by law, beginning on the effective date of the changes made 6to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly and until June 30, 2025, as directed by the Governor, 8the State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer 9shall transfer up to a total of $370,000,000 from the General 10Revenue Fund to the Fund for Illinois' Future. 11    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 12for by law, as soon as practical after the effective date of 13this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the State 14Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 15transfer $370,000,000 from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 16the General Revenue Fund. 17    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 18for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 19practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 20Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $500,000 from the General 21Revenue Fund to the Governor's Administrative Fund. 22    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 23for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 24practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 25Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $100,000 from the General 26Revenue Fund to the Grant Accountability and Transparency   HB4866- 3 -LRB104 15769 HLH 28958 b1Fund. 2    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 3for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 4practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 5Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $5,000,000 from the 6General Revenue Fund to the DHS State Projects Fund. 7    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 8for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 9practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 10Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $4,000,000 from the 11Capital Projects Fund to the Capital Development Board 12Revolving Fund. 13    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 14for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 15practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 16Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $15,000,000 from the 17Criminal Justice Information Projects Fund to the Department 18of Human Services Community Services Fund. 19    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 20for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 21practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 22Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $5,000,000 from the 23Underground Storage Tank Fund to the Brownfields Redevelopment 24Fund.25    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 26for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as   HB4866- 4 -LRB104 15769 HLH 28958 b1practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 2Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $10,000,000 from the State 3Police Services Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance 4Fund. 5    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 6for by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 7104th General Assembly or as soon thereafter as practical, but 8no later than June 30, 2025, the State Comptroller shall 9direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer $200,000,000 10from the General Revenue Fund to the Technology Management 11Revolving Fund. 12    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 13for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 14practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 15Treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Compassionate Use 16of Medical Cannabis Fund to the Department of Human Services 17Community Services Fund.18    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 19for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 20practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 21Treasurer shall transfer $75,000,000 from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Tier 2 SSWB Reserve Fund.23    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 24for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 25practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 26Treasurer shall transfer $6,000,000 from the Illinois   HB4866- 5 -LRB104 15769 HLH 28958 b1Agricultural Loan Guarantee Fund to the General Revenue Fund. 2    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 3for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 4practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 5Treasurer shall transfer $4,000,000 from the Illinois Farmer 6and Agribusiness Loan Guarantee Fund to the General Revenue 7Fund. 8    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 9for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 10practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 11Treasurer shall transfer $20,000,000 from the Insurance 12Producer Administration Fund to the General Revenue Fund. 13    In addition to any other transfers that may be provided 14for by law, on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as 15practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 16Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $12,500,000 from the 17Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund to the Statewide 189-8-8 Trust Fund. Beginning June 30, 2026, at the direction of 19the Secretary of Human Services, the State Comptroller shall 20direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer the sum of 21$12,500,000 from the Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund to the 22Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund. 23(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 104-2, 24eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-10-25.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.